District of Columbia statutes.
28-2711

Daylight savings time.

The standard time applicable in the District of Columbia shall be advanced by one hour from 2:00 a.m. on the second Sunday in March of each year until 2:00 a.m. on the first Sunday in November of each year and this time, known as daylight savings time, shall, during the period of the year for which it is applicable, be the standard time for the District of Columbia.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 672, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-133, § 2, 31 DCR 5720
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 27(b), 44 DCR 1271
Dec. 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-45, § 3, 58 DCR 8937
This section is referenced in § 25-723.
1981 Ed., § 28-2711.
1973 Ed., § 28-2711.
D.C. Law 19-45 substituted “2:00 a.m. on the second Sunday in March of each year until 2:00 a.m. on the first Sunday in November” for “2:00 AM on the last Sunday in April of each year until 2:00 AM on the last Sunday in October”.